ro-RO: Tehnologia motorului mașinii de tuns: Cu perii; Fără perii; Altele
vi: Công nghệ động cơ kẹp: Chổi than; Không chổi than; Khác
sv: Klippmaskinenens motorteknik: Borstad; Borstlös; Övrigt
fi: Leikkuukoneen moottoritekniikka: Harjallinen; Harjaton; Muu
pt-BR: Tecnologia do motor da máquina de cortar cabelo: Escovado; Brushless; Outras
pt-PT: Tecnologia de motor do aparador de cabelo: Com escovas; Sem escovas; Outra
hu: Nyírógépmotor technológiája: Kefés; Kefe nélküli; Egyéb
zh-CN: 理发器电机技术: 有刷; 无刷; 其他
lt-LT: Kirpimo mašinėlės variklio technologija: Šepetėlinis; Bešepetėlinis; Kita
pl: Technologia silnika maszynki: Szczotkowy; Bezszczotkowy; Inna
tr: Tıraş makinesi motor teknolojisi: Fırçalı; Fırçasız; Diğer
sk-SK: Technológia kliperového motora: Kefový; Bezkefový; Iné
it: Tecnologia del motore Clipper: A spazzole; Senza spazzole; Altro
el: Τεχνολογία μοτέρ κουρευτικής μηχανής: Με ψήκτρες; Χωρίς ψήκτρες; Άλλο
hr-HR: Tehnologija motora stroja za šišanje: S četkicama; Bez četkica; Ostalo
de: Motortechnologie des Haarschneiders: Mit Bürsten; Bürstenlos; Andere
th: เทคโนโลยีมอเตอร์ของเครื่องตัดผม: มีแปรงถ่าน; ไร้แปรงถ่าน; อื่นๆ
nb: Clipper-motorteknologi: Børstet; Børsteløs; Annet
ja: クリッパーモーター技術: ブラシ付き; ブラシレス; その他
bg-BG: Технология на мотора на машинката за подстригване: Четков; Безчетков; Други
es: Tecnología de motor de la cortadora: Con escobillas; Sin escobillas; Otro
da: Motorteknologi i hesteklipper: Med kulbørster; Børsteløs; Andet
nl: Tondeuse motortechnologie: Geborsteld; Borstelloos; Overig
ko: 이발기 모터 기술: 브러시드; 브러시리스; 기타
cs: Technologie motoru zastřihovače: Uhlíkový; Bezuhlíkový; Jiný
ru: Технология мотора машинки для стрижки: Щеточный; Бесщеточный; Другое
sl-SI: Tehnologija motorja strižnika: S krtačkami; Brezkrtačna; Drugo
en: Clipper motor technology: Brushed; Brushless; Other
zh-TW: 理髮器馬達技術: 有刷; 無刷; 其他
fr: Technologie du moteur de la tondeuse: Avec balais; Sans balais; Autre